Arkansas, session 2025, HB1718.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 20, Chapter 9, Subchapter 2, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
20-9-225. Standards for surgical smoke evacuation — Definitions.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Energy-generating device" means a tool that performs a
surgical function using heat, laser, electricity, or other form of energy;
(2)(A) "Smoke evacuation system" means a smoke evacuator, laser
plume evacuator, or local exhaust ventilator that effectively captures and
neutralizes surgical smoke at the site of origin and before the surgical
smoke can make ocular contact or contact with the respiratory tract of
occupants of the room.
(B) "Smoke evacuation system" is not required to be
interconnected to a surgical ventilation system or medical gas system; and
(3) "Surgical smoke" means the gaseous by-product produced by
energy-generating devices, including surgical plume, smoke plume, bio-
aerosols, laser-generated airborne contaminants, or lung-damaging dust.
*JMB242*
03/10/2025 8:37:57 AM JMB242

HB1718
(b) Any healthcare facility licensed by the Department of Health that
uses energy-generating devices shall use a smoke evacuation system during any
surgical procedure involving an energy-generating device that is likely to
produce surgical smoke.
(c) The State Board of Health and the department may take any action
under § 20-9-215 necessary for a violation of this section.






























03/10/2025 8:37:57 AM JMB242